Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska9-255.01
Bingo cards, equipment, and supplies; requirements.

All bingo cards and any other bingo equipment or supplies furnished, sold, rented, or leased for use at any bingo occasion subject to regulation under the Nebraska Bingo Act shall conform in all respects to the specifications imposed by rule and regulation by the department, including, but not limited to, the proper manufacture, assembly, packaging, and numbering of bingo cards. All bingo cards and any other bingo equipment or supplies which do not conform to such specifications shall be considered contraband goods pursuant to section 9-262.01.

Laws 1994, LB 694, § 49.